Colorado, session 2026A, HB1361.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37-403, amend
(6)(b); and add (9) as follows:
24-37-403. Establishment of state pay for success contracts
program - pay for success contracts fund - creation - repeal.
(6) (b) (I) Interest and income earned on the deposit and investment
of money in the fund is credited to the fund; except that interest and income
earned on the deposit and investment of money in the account is credited to
the account. Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the
office shall expend money in the fund and in the account to make payments
to the lead contractor as required by a contract and to pay any administrative
expenses incurred in connection with a contract. The office shall expend
money in the account solely for the programs listed in section 24-37-404,
but the department of human services may expend any money appropriated
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

to it from the account for personal services and operating expenses related
to the administration of any contract.
(II) ON JUNE 30, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER THE
BALANCE OF MONEY IN THE ACCOUNT AND THE MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
(9) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1361

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1361